Arkansas statutes. Title 22 Public Property
Chapter 3 Public Buildings and Other Facilities
Subchapter 17

— Firefighters Monument

Cross References.

Capitol Arts and Grounds Commission, §§22-3-501 et seq.

Effective Dates.

Acts 2001, No. 504, § 6: March 1, 2001. The emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that a delay in the effective date of this act would cause unnecessary delay in raising funds for the materials, construction, and maintenance of the monument recognizing and honoring our fallen firefighters; and that this project should be undertaken as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

22-3-1701. Findings and purpose.

(a)

It is found and determined by the General Assembly that:

(1)

Many Arkansans serve each year as full-time firefighters, volunteer firefighters, forestry firefighters, and training academy firefighters;

(2)

Firefighters in many communities serve their citizens as emergency medical technicians, hazardous material specialists, and bomb technicians and serve in numerous rescue emergencies;

(3)

Upon occasion, fire or disaster claims the life of a firefighter in the course of his or her duties; and

(4)

Arkansas firefighters have not received the recognition and honor deserved for service to their fellow citizens.

(b)

In recognition and appreciation of Arkansas' fallen firefighters, an appropriate monument should be constructed and maintained on the State Capitol grounds.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 504, § 1.

22-3-1702. Authorization.

The Secretary of State is authorized to assist and coordinate with the Arkansas Fallen Firefighters' Memorial Board in the construction of a monument on the grounds of the State Capitol honoring:

(1)

Arkansans and other firefighters killed in Arkansas while acting in their capacity as firefighters; and

(2)

Any Arkansas firefighter killed outside the State of Arkansas while serving in the capacity of a firefighter.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 504, § 2.

22-3-1703. Design and location.

The design of the monument and the location of the monument on the State Capitol grounds shall be approved by the Arkansas Fallen Firefighters' Memorial Board and the Capitol Arts and Grounds Commission.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 504, § 3.

22-3-1704. Funding.

(a)

The State of Arkansas shall not be obligated to fund the Arkansas Fallen Firefighters' Memorial.

(b)

The Arkansas Fallen Firefighters' Memorial Board shall raise all funds necessary for materials, construction, and maintenance of the monument.

(c)

The board shall comply with the rules of the Capitol Arts and Grounds Commission regarding creation of a maintenance fund.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 504, § 4; 2019, No. 315, § 2362.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (c).

22-3-1705. Commencement of construction.

Construction of the Arkansas Fallen Firefighters' Memorial shall commence only after all requirements of the Capitol Arts and Grounds Commission are met.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 504, § 5.

Subchapter 18

— Arkansas Energy and Natural Resource Conservation Act

Effective Dates.

Acts 2005, No. 1770, § 2: July 1, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that there is a need to incorporate energy and natural resource conservation measures into state buildings and state-funded buildings; that this act will assist the state to provide better use of natural resources, and that this act is immediately necessary because of the need to incorporate standards into new construction. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2005.”

22-3-1801. Title.

This subchapter shall be known and may be referred to as the “Arkansas Energy and Natural Resource Conservation Act”.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1770, § 1.

22-3-1802. Findings and purpose.

(a)

It is found and determined by the General Assembly that:

(1)

State-funded building projects have a significant impact on the environment of our Natural State, the economy, and the health and productivity of building inhabitants;

(2)

State government currently spends approximately seventy million dollars ($70,000,000) annually for electricity and natural gas consumed in state buildings, and energy expenditures have been increasing at nearly four percent (4%) per year over the last ten (10) years;

(3)

It is incumbent upon Arkansas state government to lead by example to minimize energy use and environmental impact in state buildings;

(4)

Innovations in building science, technology, and operations are available to maximize the economic utility of state-funded building projects and reduce energy costs, while achieving the best environmental performance and reducing adverse impacts on the environment; and

(5)

Incorporating principles of sustainability in building design will enhance efficient management of material resources and waste, protect health and indoor environmental quality, reduce the longer-term costs of construction and operation of state-funded buildings, and promote the use of appropriate Arkansas products in the buildings.

(b)

In recognition of the economic, energy conservation, and environmental benefits of sustainable building design, it is in the best interest of the State of Arkansas to initiate a process to encourage improved building practices, to provide support and information to assist state agencies in carrying out the purposes of this subchapter, and to continue development of the best building practices through a legislative task force to evaluate and report to the General Assembly the progress being made under this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1770, § 1.

22-3-1803. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

(1)

“Adaptive reuse” means the modification to accommodate a function other than its original intent of any building site and existing inhabited structure;

(2)(A)

“Building project” means any inhabited physical structure and project building site. The phrase includes any structure in which any individual spends more than one (1) hour of time within the structure such as residences, offices, visitors centers, classrooms, administration buildings, etc.

(B)

“Building project” does not include ancillary structures or buildings with temporary occupancy such as park restrooms, pavilions, storage facilities, or similar structures;

(3)

“Grant applicant” means any individual, institution, governmental jurisdiction, or other organization recognized by the granting department or agency as qualified to apply for financial assistance from any state department, agency, or office for the purpose of planning, designing, or constructing a new or rehabilitated building;

(4)(A)

“Green Globes” means the online environmental assessment tool developed by the Green Building Initiative as of December 2004.

(B)

“Green Globes” allows designers, property owners, and managers to evaluate and rate buildings against best sustainable building design and practices and integrate principles of sustainable architecture at every stage of project delivery in order to design and construct buildings that will be energy-efficient and resource-efficient, achieve operational savings, and provide healthier environments in which to live and work;

(5)(A)

“Leadership in Energy and Environmental Design” means the following building rating systems developed by the United States Green Building Council:

(i)

LEED-NC 2.1, as it exists on January 1, 2005;

(ii)

LEED-EB, as it exists on January 1, 2005; or

(iii)

LEED-CI, as it exists on January 1, 2005.

(B)

“Leadership in Energy and Environmental Design” allows designers, property owners, and managers to evaluate and rate buildings against best sustainable building design and practices and to integrate principles of sustainable architecture at every stage of project delivery in order to design and construct buildings that will be energy-efficient and resource-efficient, achieve operational savings, and provide healthier environments in which to live and work;

(6)

“Newly designed construction project” means any building and its building site for which a contract has been entered into beginning July 1, 2005, to construct a building and building site improvements as outlined in Leadership in Energy and Environmental Design or Green Globes rating systems;

(7)

“Project building site” means all property associated with a building, including the defined legal description of the property or the defined project limits;

(8)(A)

“Project limits” means the physical boundaries of a construction project within which all construction activity must occur.

(B)

“Project limits” includes material and equipment storage space, lay-down or prefabrication space, clearing, grubbing, and drainage improvements;

(9)

“Project team” means the persons or individuals representing the state agency or owner, professional design consultants, and building contractor, if a contractor is determined prior to design;

(10)

“Proposed construction project” means all building construction projects in the conceptual planning stages for which a design contract has been executed after July 1, 2005;

(11)

“Public and private partnerships” means any private development that uses state money to assist in the planning, design, or construction of a building project, such as a building project providing economic incentives for development;

(12)

“Public funding” means federal or state funds that are allocated for a state building project;

(13)

“Rehabilitation project” means any building project involving the modification or adaptive reuse of an existing facility in which twenty-five percent (25%) or more of the physical structure, facade, or interior space of a facility is being changed or modified;

(14)

“State agency” means all departments, offices, boards, commissions, and institutions of the state, including the state-supported institutions of higher education;

(15)

“State building project” means any inhabited physical structure and project building site in which:

(A)

A state agency secures the design or construction contract; and

(B)

Public funding is used in whole or in part to design or construct the project; and

(16)

“Sustainable” means that:

(A)

A building integrates building materials and methods that promote environmental quality, energy conservation, economic vitality, and social benefit through the design, construction, and operation of the built environment;

(B)

A building merges sound, environmentally responsible practices into one (1) discipline that looks at the environmental, economic, and social effects of a building or built project as a whole; and

(C)

The design encompasses the following broad topics:

(i)

Efficient management of energy and water resources;

(ii)

Management of material resources and waste;

(iii)

Protection of environmental quality;

(iv)

Protection of health and indoor environmental quality;

(v)

Reinforcement of natural systems; and

(vi)

Integrating the design approach.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1770, § 1.

22-3-1804. Standards for Arkansas.

(a)

If a state agency decides to pursue either the Leadership in Energy and Environmental Design certification or the Green Globes certification, the standards of this section shall apply for the purpose of state building projects.

(b)(1)

Use of the Leadership in Energy and Environmental Design rating system shall be with the following supplemental provisions specific to state building projects:

(A)

Under LEED EQ Credit 4.4, one (1) point shall be awarded for the use of composite wood and agrifiber products if the architect or responsible party provides appropriate documentation that the products are third-party certified as meeting the American National Standards Institute standard requirements, ANSI A208.1 for Particleboard Standard, ANSI A208.2 for MDF, for formaldehyde emissions, or contain no added urea-formaldehyde;

(B)

Under LEED MR Credit 4, one (1) point shall be awarded when the sum of postconsumer recycled content plus one-half (½) of the preconsumer recycled content constitutes at least ten percent (10%) of the total value of the materials in the project. A second point shall be awarded if the sum of postconsumer recycled content plus one-half (½) of the preconsumer content constitutes at least twenty percent (20%) of the total value of the materials in the project. The valuation is to be determined by using the LEED-NC letter template;

(C)

Under LEED MR Credit 6, one (1) point shall also be awarded for the use of renewable, bio-based materials for five percent (5%) of the total value of all the products used in the project that are either residuals of or products grown or harvested under a recognized sustainable management system such as the Forest Stewardship Council, the Sustainable Forestry Initiative program, the American Tree Farm System, the Canadian Standards Association, the Organic Trade Association, and the Association for Bamboo in Construction. The applicable vendor's or manufacturer's certification documentation must be provided;

(D)

Under LEED MR Credit 7, one (1) point shall also be awarded for the use of renewable, bio-based raw materials certified in accordance with one (1) or more premier certification programs for environmental management for fifty percent (50%) of the total value of all bio-based materials and products used in the project. Certification programs include, but are not limited to, the Forest Stewardship Council, the Sustainable Forestry Initiative program, the American Tree Farm System, the Canadian Standards Association, the Organic Trade Association, and the Association for Bamboo in Construction. The applicable vendor's or manufacturer's certification documentation must be provided;

(E)

Under LEED ID Credit 1.1, one (1) point will be awarded if five percent (5%) or more of the mass of all building materials used are carbon-sequestering bio-based products managed under a recognized sustainable management plan; and

(F)

Under LEED ID Credit 1.2, one (1) point will be awarded for the use of bio-based materials derived from multiple credible certified sources supported by an environmental management system certified under the International Organization for Standardization standard ISO 14001, including the Forest Stewardship Council, the Sustainable Forestry Initiative, the American Tree Farm System, the Canadian Standards Association, the Organic Trade Association, and the Association for Bamboo in Construction. The applicable vendor's or manufacturer's certification documentation must be provided.

(2)

Use of the Green Globes rating system shall be with the following supplemental provision specific to state building projects:

(A)

An additional fifteen (15) points shall be awarded if five percent (5%) or more of the mass of all building materials used are carbon-sequestering wood bio-based products; and

(B)

Fifteen (15) points will be awarded for the use of bio-based materials derived from multiple credible certified sources supported by an environmental management system certified under the International Organization for Standardization standard ISO 14001, including the Forest Stewardship Council, the Sustainable Forestry Initiative, the American Tree Farm System, the Canadian Standards Association, the Organic Trade Association, and the Association for Bamboo in Construction. The applicable vendor's or manufacturer's certification documentation must be provided.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1770, § 1.

22-3-1805. Application to state building projects.

State agencies conducting or funding a public building project or rehabilitation project are encouraged to refer to and should utilize, whenever possible and appropriate, the Leadership in Energy and Environmental Design or Green Globes rating systems referred to in this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1770, § 1.

22-3-1806. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning the Legislative Task Force on Sustainable Building Design and Practices, was repealed by identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, §
87. The section was derived from Acts 2005, No. 1770, § 1; 2007, No. 1034, §§ 1, 2; 2009, No. 1336, § 1.

Subchapter 19

— Sustainable Building Design Program

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2016, No. 240, § 21, provided: “SUSTAINABLE BUILDING DESIGN PROGRAM — RULES AND REGULATIONS. Rules and Regulations shall be established and administered by the Department of Finance and Administration — Building Authority Division for the Sustainable Building Design Program prior to the implementation of any transfers of appropriation and/or funding. The Rules and Regulations shall be reviewed by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee prior to implementation.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2016 through June 30, 2017.”

Effective Dates.

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, § 153: July 1, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Arkansas Building Authority, the Arkansas Science and Technology Authority, the Department of Rural Services, and the Division of Land Surveys of the Arkansas Agriculture Department are inefficiently structured; that this inefficient structuring causes an excessive and unnecessary cost to the taxpayers of the this state; and that this act is essential to alleviating that financial burden. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2015.”

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 129: May 23, 2016. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the membership and duties of certain agencies, task forces, committees, and commissions and repeals other governmental entities; that these revisions and repeals of governmental entities impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the provisions of this act should become effective as soon as possible to allow for implementation of the new provisions in advance of the upcoming fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

22-3-1901. Sustainable Building Design Program for State Agencies.

There is created the Sustainable Building Design Program for State Agencies to be administered by the Building Authority Division.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1372, § 1; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 52; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 52; 2019, No. 910, § 6223.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, § 1, provided:

“Transfer of the Arkansas Building Authority to the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(a)(1)

The Arkansas Building Authority is transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)

For the purposes of this act, the Department of Finance and Administration shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)

All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration, except as specified by this act.

“(c)

All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications are transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(d)

The members of the Arkansas Building Authority Council, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the council except as specified in this act.

“(e)

The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make appropriate name changes in the Arkansas Code to implement this act.”

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment by Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8 substituted “Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Arkansas Building Authority”.

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division”.

22-3-1902. Rules.

(a)

The Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services shall promulgate rules for the implementation of the Sustainable Building Design Program for State Agencies.

(b)

The rules shall include without limitation:

(1)

Application forms;

(2)

Origination fees, if any;

(3)

Eligibility requirements;

(4)

Review standards; and

(5)

Loan requirements.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1372, § 1; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 53; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 53; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 80; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 80; 2019, No. 910, § 3499.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, § 1, provided:

“Transfer of the Arkansas Building Authority to the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(a)(1)

The Arkansas Building Authority is transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)

For the purposes of this act, the Department of Finance and Administration shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)

All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration, except as specified by this act.

“(c)

All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications are transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(d)

The members of the Arkansas Building Authority Council, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the council except as specified in this act.

“(e)

The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make appropriate name changes in the Arkansas Code to implement this act.”

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 1, provided:

“(a)

The General Assembly finds:

“(1)

State government provides vital functions that impact the lives of Arkansas citizens on a daily basis;

“(2)

While these functions are important, it is equally important to ensure that state government operates efficiently and effectively to eliminate unnecessary spending of tax dollars and provide timely and quality services to Arkansas citizens; and

“(3)

Issues such as the administrative organization of a governmental entity, the appointment structure of a governmental entity's governing board, and extraneous duties assigned to governmental entities hamper the operation of state government and result in unnecessary expenses and delays in the provision of state services.

“(b)

It is the intent of this act to amend provisions of law applicable to certain agencies, task forces, committees, and commission to promote efficiency and effectiveness in the operations of state government as a whole.”

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment by Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8 substituted “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration with the advice of the Building Authority Council”
for “Arkansas Building Authority” in (a).

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 deleted “with the advice of the Building Authority Council” following “Administration” in (a).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (a).

22-3-1903. Loans.

(a)

Under the Sustainable Building Design Program for State Agencies, the Building Authority Division may authorize money to be loaned from the Sustainable Building Design Revolving Loan Fund to a state agency, board, or commission.

(b)

A loan made under subsection (a) of this section shall be:

(1)

For a renovation of state-owned property; and

(2)

In an amount that exceeds two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).

(c)(1)

The division shall credit an origination fee to the Building Authority Division Maintenance Fund for expenses associated with the administration of the program.

(2)

The term for repayment of the loan may not exceed ten (10) years.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1372, § 1; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 54; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 54; 2019, No. 910, § 6224.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, § 1, provided:

“Transfer of the Arkansas Building Authority to the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(a)(1)

The Arkansas Building Authority is transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)

For the purposes of this act, the Department of Finance and Administration shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)

All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration, except as specified by this act.

“(c)

All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications are transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(d)

The members of the Arkansas Building Authority Council, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the council except as specified in this act.

“(e)

The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make appropriate name changes in the Arkansas Code to implement this act.”

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment by Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8 substituted “Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Arkansas Building Authority” in (a); and in (c)(1), substituted “The division” for “The authority” and “Building Authority Division Maintenance Fund” for “Arkansas Building Authority Maintenance Fund”.

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” in (a).

Cross References.

Building Authority Division Maintenance Fund, §19-5-1046.

Sustainable Building Design Revolving Loan Fund, §19-5-1238.

22-3-1904. Loan approval process.

(a)

An applicant for a loan from the Sustainable Building Design Revolving Loan Fund shall:

(1)

Apply on a form approved by the Building Authority Division; and

(2)(A)

Remit an origination fee of one-half of one percent (0.5%) of the requested amount of the loan.

(B)

However, the amount of the origination fee shall not exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

(b)

The division shall review the application to determine if the applicant satisfies the eligibility criteria for a loan from the fund.

(c)

The division shall provide the applicant written notice of its determination whether to offer a loan from the fund and any conditions for making the loan.

(d)

After the applicant has satisfied any preconditions, if any, for the division's approval of the loan and has executed a contract for the loan, the division shall forward the loan contract to the Department of Finance and Administration and the Governor for their approval.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1372, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 6225.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” in (a)(1).

Cross References.

Sustainable Building Design Revolving Loan Fund, §
19-5-1238.

Subchapter 20

— Sustainable Energy-Efficient Buildings Act

Effective Dates.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

22-3-2001. Title — Legislative findings.

(a)

This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Sustainable Energy-Efficient Buildings Act”.

(b)

The General Assembly finds that:

(1)

Public buildings can be built and renovated using sustainable, energy-efficient methods that save money, reduce negative environmental impacts, improve employee and student performance, and make employees and students more productive;

(2)

The main objectives of sustainable, energy-efficient designs are to:

(A)

Avoid resource depletion of energy, water, and raw materials;

(B)

Prevent environmental degradation caused by facilities and infrastructure throughout their life cycle; and

(C)

Create buildings that are livable, comfortable, safe, and productive; and

(3)

State-owned buildings and buildings owned by an institution of higher education can be improved by establishing specific performance criteria and goals for sustainable, energy-efficient public buildings that are based on recognized, consensual standards with a scientifically proven basis and a history of successful performance.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1494, § 1; 2019, No. 674, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment added “Title” in the section heading; added (a); added designation (b) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions.

22-3-2002. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

(1)

“Institution of higher education” means a state-supported university or college;

(2)

“Life-cycle cost analysis” means an analytical technique that considers the costs of owning, using, and operating a facility over its economic life including without limitation:

(A)

Initial costs;

(B)

System repair and replacement costs;

(C)

Maintenance costs;

(D)

Operating costs, including energy costs; and

(E)

Salvage value;

(3)(A)

“Major facility” means a construction project of:

(i)

A single building larger than twenty thousand (20,000) gross square feet of occupied or conditioned space; or

(ii)

Aggregate buildings larger than fifty thousand (50,000) combined square feet of occupied or conditioned space.

(B)

“Major facility” does not include a transmitter building or a pumping station;

(4)

“Major renovation” means a building renovation project that:

(A)

Costs more than fifty percent (50%) of its current replacement value;

(B)

Is a single building larger than twenty thousand (20,000) gross square feet of occupied or conditioned space or aggregate buildings larger than fifty thousand (50,000) combined square feet of occupied or conditioned space; and

(C)

Is funded in whole or in part by the state;

(5)

“Public agency” means a state agency, office, officer, board, department, or commission with more than fifty thousand (50,000) gross square feet of occupied or conditioned space; and

(6)

“Sustainable, energy-efficient public building” means a public building that:

(A)

Has the most economical energy and water efficiency for that type of building; and

(B)

Is in compliance with this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1494, § 1; 2019, No. 674, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment rewrote (3)(A), (4)(B), and (6); and in (5), inserted “with more than fifty thousand (50,000) gross square feet of occupied or conditioned space”.

22-3-2003. Sustainable Energy-Efficient Buildings Program.

(a)

The Sustainable Energy-Efficient Buildings Program is established to promote energy conservation in buildings owned or leased by public agencies and buildings owned or leased by institutions of higher education.

(b)

Under the Sustainable Energy-Efficient Buildings Program:

(1)

For public agencies, the Arkansas Energy Office of the Division of Environmental Quality shall develop and:

(A)

Issue policies and technical guidelines to establish procedures and methods for compliance with the criteria and the performance standards for a major facility or a major renovation under §22-3-2004; and

(B)

Administer an energy management program designed to achieve compliance with the requirements of §22-3-2006 through the implementation of energy conservation measures; and

(2)

For the institutions of higher education, each institution of higher education:

(A)

Shall develop and issue policies and technical guidelines to establish procedures and methods for compliance with the criteria and the performance standards for a major facility or a major renovation under §22-3-2004; and

(B)

May administer an energy management program designed to achieve compliance with the requirements of §22-3-2006 through the implementation of energy conservation measures.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1494, § 1; 2011, No. 803, § 1; 2017, No. 271, § 16; 2019, No. 674, § 3; 2019, No. 910, § 3228.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment deleted “and an operation and maintenance program” following “energy management program” in (b)(1)(B) and (b)(2)(B).

The 2017 amendment inserted “of the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (b)(1).

The 2019 amendment by No. 674 inserted “or leased” twice in (a).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in the introductory language of (b)(1).